Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.135

Powers and duties of regents—Employment of architects, engineers, for construction of buildings and facilities.

The board shall have power to employ or contract for the services of skilled architects and engineers to prepare plans and specifications, and supervise the construction of university buildings and facilities and to fix the compensation for such employees or for such services.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.135. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 242 s 10; RRS s 4563. Formerly RCW 28.77.133.]